Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-9003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Assistance Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Housing-related assistance includes rental payments, utility payments, security and utility deposits, and other related costs and payments;

(3) Qualified third party means an organization that:

(a) Is a nonprofit organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or a federally recognized Indian tribe with a governmental body in this state; and

(b) Has an affiliation agreement with the Department of Health and Human Services to provide services to victims of domestic violence and sexual assault under the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, or provides direct services to victims of trafficking;

(4) Sex trafficking survivor means a person subjected to sex trafficking as defined in section 28-830 or sex trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830; and

(5) Victim of domestic violence means a victim of any of the following:

(a) Abuse as defined in section 42-903;

(b) Domestic assault under section 28-323;

(c) Sexual assault and sexual assault of a child under sections 28-319 to 28-320.01; and

(d) Stalking under section 28-311.03.

Laws 2025, LB78, § 2.

Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, see section 42-901.